South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 47 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 47-9-70. Regardless of any rules or regulations promulgated by a county, municipality, or political subdivision, any resident in this State may raise and keep up to five chicken hens or ten quail hens per household for personal use and consumption of eggs on lots with single-family dwellings. Nothing in this section prohibits a county, municipality, or political subdivision from allowing a resident from raising or keeping a greater number of chicken hens or quail hens. SECTION 2.  The provisions of this act expire on January 1, 2026. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----